Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2707.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 8338.2. Liability for damages from donated menstrual products.(a) Donor immunity.--A person who donates a menstrual product in good faith to a nonprofit organization for ultimate free distribution to an individual in need of the menstrual product is not subject to civil or criminal liability arising from the nature, age, packaging or condition of the menstrual product if the menstrual product is apparently fit for use.(b) Nonprofit organization immunity.--A nonprofit organization that distributes a menstrual product in good faith 123456789101112131415161718 to an individual in need of the menstrual product is not subject to civil or criminal liability arising from the nature, age, packaging or condition of the menstrual product if the menstrual product is apparently fit for use.(c) Exception.--Subsection (a) or (b) shall not apply to an injury or death of the ultimate user or recipient of the menstrual product that results from an act or omission of the donor or nonprofit organization constituting gross negligence, recklessness or intentional misconduct.(d) Nonliability.--This section does not create liability.(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Donate." To give or distribute without requiring anything of monetary value from the ultimate recipient. For purposes of this section, a nonprofit organization may donate to another nonprofit organization, notwithstanding that the donor organization has charged a processing fee to the donee organization, provided the ultimate recipient or user is not required to give anything of monetary value."Menstrual product." A sanitary napkin, tampon, liner, menstrual cup, period underwear or similar product used in connection with menstruation."Nonprofit organization." An incorporated or unincorporated organization that has been incorporated or established and is operating for religious, charitable or educational purposes and that does not distribute any of its income to its members, directors or officers."Person." An individual, corporation, partnership, organization, association or government entity. In the case of a 20260HB2707PN3783 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 corporation, partnership, organization, association or governmental entity, the term also includes an officer, director, partner, deacon, trustee, council member or other elected or appointed individual responsible for the governance of the entity.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2707PN3783 - 3 - 123456